Spell/share/myspell/dicts/fo_FO.dic
Bjarna/R
Erna/R
Heina/R
Kalsoynna/R
Lida/R
Micka/R
Nólsoynna/R
ST-høvuðsborgina/R
Titta/R
abbadótturina/R
aftur/vwy
afturlatnir/v
afturtikið/v
afturtøku/v
alari/v
alda/PQR
aling/v
alingin/v
almenna/PQR
andstyggiliga/PQR
arbeiðsleiðara/R
arktiska/R
at/v
atfinnandi/z
atsóknarmanna/R
avgreiddan/z
avskrivað/z
avstraliumanna/R
bakka/OPQR
bardaga/R
beinagrindina/R
bering/wy
bileftirlitsmanna/R
bindandi/z
binding/w
bjargingarmanna/R
bjóð/y
bjóðandi/wx
blandað/z
blása/R
blíðir/z
blóma/x
blómað/x
blómaðu/x
bodnir/w
bodnu/wz
borin/wy
boringina/R
borið/w
borna/w
bornar/w
boð/KLMvx
boði/vxy
boðin/wyz
boðið/vxy
boðnum/vxy
breiddir/y
brend/v
brendir/vy
brendur/v
brennistøðina/R
brent/v
brot/w
brotin/y
brotini/w
brotið/x
brotnir/x
brotum/w
broytandi/z
broyttar/z
broyttum/z
brunatrygdina/R
brúkaraumboðsmanna/R
bundum/z
burðarmenninir/x
burðarmonnunum/x
bygda/PQRy
bygdamanna/R
bygdar/vyz
bygdir/v
bygdum/wz
bygdur/vwyz
bygging/vy
byggingar/vy
byggingina/vy
byggir/v
byggið/v
byggja/vy
byggjast/y
bygnaði/v
bygnaðin/v
bygning/w
bygt/vyz
byrgdi/x
byrgdur/x
byrgir/x
byrgt/x
bátsmanna/R
bónda/R
búgv/w
búgva/y
búgving/y
búgvið/wy
búnaði/y
búnaðurin/y
búnum/y
búskaparstøðuna/R
býli/x
dagliga/PQR
deytt/y
deyva/PQR
doktaraferðina/R
driv/w
drukkin/x
drykkjumanna/R
dráttin/x
dráttunum/x
dráttur/w
dugnaliga/z
dálkað/z
dáma/PQR
dámligt/z
dømda/PQR
dúkar/x
dúkaðu/x
dýpið/x
eftir/vwy
eftirstøðulista/R
eira/R
elta/PQR
endaligir/z
eplakrubbuna/R
etin/v
etið/wx
etnir/v
eykamanna/R
fakfelagsformanna/R
fall/x
fallinum/x
falnum/z
fals/x
farin/vy
farnir/wy
farra/R
fatast/v
fatað/v
fati/v
ferðafrádrátta/PQR
fima/PQR
fiskimálaráðharra/R
fjórðingsfinaluna/R
flagging/y
fleygamanna/R
flotahermanna/R
flotið/y
flutning/wy
flutningi/wy
flutningin/wy
flutninginum/wy
flutningsgjøld/w
flutningsloyvi/w
flutningsmøguleiki/y
flutningur/wy
flutningurin/wy
flutt/wy
fluttan/wy
fluttar/w
flutti/w
fluttir/w
fluttu/wy
fluttur/wy
flyt/wy
flytan/w
flytandi/w
flytast/wy
flytingarnar/vw
flytir/w
flýggjan/y
foreldrafunda/PQR
forgeingiligan/z
forgongiligt/z
formligi/z
forsvarligar/z
fostra/R
franskmanna/R
friðarligt/z
friðarmannin/z
friðarmaður/z
friðarmenninir/z
friðartilgongdina/R
friði/z
frukt/z
frá/vy
frásøgnina/R
frættir/z
fullkomileika/R
fullkomið/z
funnið/v
fyllandi/vy
fylling/v
fyllið/v
fyltir/v
fyri/vwy
fyrisitingina/R
fíggjarløgtingslógina/R
fólkaligur/z
fólkanavnalista/R
fótfima/R
fødd/w
føddu/w
førd/w
førdar/w
føroysk/z
fúka/R
galda/x
gang/wy
ganga/PQRw
gangandi/y
gangast/w
ganginum/w
gangur/wy
gangurin/w
gentubarna/R
ger/x
gerast/x
gerð/vxyz
gerðarrætt/x
gerðarrættinum/x
gerðir/vxz
gevarar/y
gevur/v
giftu/z
gingin/y
gingið/wy
gingnir/y
givið/vy
givnir/vy
gjald/wxy
gjaldi/wx
gjaldingar/y
gjaldingin/y
gjaldið/wxy
gjaldoyra/R
gjøldini/wxy
gjørd/xyz
gjørdar/vx
gjørdu/x
gjørdur/xy
gjørligt/z
goldin/wyz
goldið/wy
goldnar/wyz
gomlu/x
gongd/wy
gongda/z
gongdina/wy
gongdir/wy
gongina/R
gongu/xy
gosið/y
gravarbakka/R
greiddar/x
greiddir/xz
greiddur/xz
greinandi/y
greinast/y
greinaðar/y
greining/y
greiningarnar/y
greiningunum/y
greitt/xz
greiðast/x
greiðir/xz
greiðslurnar/x
grevsturin/xy
grivin/z
grundað/yz
grundaður/z
grónofra/R
grøði/x
gudum/x
gáva/vy
gávan/vy
gávu/vy
gávum/vy
gávuna/Rvy
gávur/vy
gæta/PQR
gævustund/z
gørt/x
hald/vx
haldandi/x
halgaði/x
halla/R
handlar/y
harra/R
havið/v
havnaskrivstovuna/R
heftan/z
heilagt/z
heilsutænastuna/R
heimin/y
heimsmeistara/R
heinta/wx
helli/y
hellir/y
heltu/y
hend/x
hendar/x
hending/x
hendingina/Rx
hent/x
hepna/Rz
heppin/z
herbergini/w
herleiðsluna/R
hevjaður/v
hildin/x
himna/R
hjúkraða/PQR
hoyrast/x
hoyrdi/x
hoyrdur/x
hoyringar/x
hoyringina/R
hoyrir/x
hoyrt/xz
hugnaligar/z
hugsandi/z
hugsað/vy
hugsaðu/v
hvirilskalla/R
hygnu/z
hylja/Rx
hátíðarhalda/R
háðaður/y
hæddina/Rv
hæddirnar/v
hóp/v
høgd/vw
høgdir/vxy
høgt/x
hús/w
húsaskuldina/R
húsi/w
húsinum/w
húsið/w
húsum/y
i/vwy
inn/y
innast/y
innrættaður/z
intu/y
ivist/w
jarnbreytarstøðina/R
javnt/z
jaðaranum/y
jøvn/z
kallan/w
kallast/vw
kallaðir/w
kallaðu/vw
kallaður/w
kanningarleiðara/R
kastið/x
kendar/z
kent/z
keyp/w
keypi/w
keypini/w
keypsprísinum/w
kinverska/PQR
klipp/y
klárað/x
klæðast/x
kollveltingina/R
komi/x
komin/wxy
komið/vxy
komnir/wxy
komnu/w
koyra/R
koyrdir/y
koyrdur/x
koyringina/x
kravdur/wz
kunnigir/z
kunnugleika/R
l/z
lagaligan/z
lagað/x
lagdan/v
lagdir/x
lagdur/vw
lagi/z
lagt/vwxy
lamin/x
lamni/x
landgonguhermanna/R
landið/y
langfaramanna/R
latin/vw
latið/v
legg/v
leggja/wxy
leiddar/x
leiddur/x
leigan/y
leigað/y
leiðandi/w
leiðsla/w
lendingar/wy
lesing/x
lestrinum/v
lesturin/v
leyva/PQR
linju/x
lisin/w
lisnum/z
lit/wy
liti/wy
litið/w
litunum/y
livast/v
livir/v
loka/OPQR
londini/y
londunum/y
lop/x
lopinum/x
lopum/x
loysing/x
loyst/xz
loysti/vx
loystur/wx
lukku/z
lurtað/x
lutar/y
lyft/x
lán/wy
lánini/wy
lánið/w
lánum/wy
lækna/R
lærdir/vz
lærir/v
lík/z
líkur/z
líða/PQR
lógligan/z
løgd/wx
løgdu/w
løgdum/vw
løgur/w
lønandi/z
lúgvað/y
lúgvaðu/y
lýdnir/z
lýsa/vx
lýsast/vx
lýsingar/v
lýsingarherferðir/v
lýsingarnar/vx
lýsingin/v
lýsir/vx
lýstar/vx
lýstir/vx
lýstur/vx
lýða/PQR
makar/z
markar/x
markaðum/x
marknaðinum/w
matna/R
menniskjaligari/z
merking/vx
merkingina/R
miðsavnaða/PQR
myndað/x
myndin/x
máling/v
mátingar/v
mátingum/v
mætasta/PQR
møguligum/z
neva/R
nevndum/z
nevndur/yz
nevnt/yz
neyvt/z
neyðugari/z
nokta/ORx
norðurlondini/y
nyttu/z
náðigávuna/R
náðum/z
nøgdum/z
nýtir/z
oljuleitingina/R
oydd/x
oyddi/x
oyddist/x
oyddur/x
oyggjar/y
oyggjum/y
oyst/y
oyði/x
oyðingar/x
pannuna/R
prent/y
prentaður/z
prísa/OPR
rakað/x
regluligur/z
reinar/z
reingerðina/R
reinleikan/z
reinskað/z
reinum/z
reisti/v
reistur/v
reið/x
revsaðan/z
rikið/x
ringt/v
ritaði/x
ritaðu/v
riti/vx
ritið/vx
rognakalva/R
rokna/ORy
roknast/x
roknað/vxy
roknaðar/x
roknaður/y
rokningar/y
rokningin/xy
rokningini/xy
rokningunum/y
royndir/z
runnin/vx
ráddu/x
ráki/y
rás/w
ráða/xz
ráðiliga/z
ræddur/z
rættan/wz
rættar/vxyz
rættari/vxy
rættarkensluna/R
rættast/wx
rættað/wxy
rættferðar/z
rættin/z
rætting/wx
rættir/v
rættum/vyz
rættvísa/PRz
rættvísir/z
rímiliga/z
rógv/z
rótina/R
róðrarbátar/y
róðrardagur/y
róðrarmann/y
róðrarmannanna/y
róðrarmanninum/y
róðrarmansins/y
róðrarmaðurin/y
róðrarmenninar/y
róðrarmonnum/y
róðurin/y
sagda/v
sagdir/v
sagnir/v
sagnunum/v
sagt/xz
salvaður/z
sambandsformanna/R
samdir/z
samsvari/z
samveldisløgregluna/R
sannlíkt/z
sats/w
savnaðar/w
savnaðu/w
sekan/z
seldir/z
semjum/z
send/y
sendir/wy
serinntøkunýtsluna/R
setast/y
sett/vwxyz
settar/vx
settu/w
settur/vwxy
seymaður/z
sigli/w
siglingini/w
sigri/z
sigur/xz
siðar/v
sjálvbjargin/z
sjálvstøðugum/z
sjálvuppgávuna/R
sjón/y
sjónligur/z
skattaviðurskifta/R
skaðiligar/z
skeinkingarloyvið/y
skil/z
skildur/wz
skipari/x
skipaði/z
skipsyvirmanna/R
skoti/v
skotið/v
skriftir/vx
skrivað/vwxy
skrivaðar/xz
skrivaðir/wxy
skrivaðu/xyz
skriving/xy
skrivingin/wx
skurðinum/x
skynsomu/z
skíta/PQR
slagið/w
sligið/vy
slitið/v
slúsa/w
smurdur/x
smúgva/R
sonn/z
sparararnir/v
spardi/v
spardur/v
sparingina/Rv
spottara/R
spræna/w
spælið/y
stevjavnaður/z
stevnuna/R
stig/v
stillar/w
stillaðu/w
stoyttir/y
strámanna/R
stóð/v
støktur/x
støð/y
støðugt/z
stýra/R
sunnum/z
svaraður/z
sviðin/x
synda/OR
síggja/w
søgd/v
søgnina/Rv
sølu/y
sølumiðstøðina/R
sømd/z
sømiligan/z
takandi/x
talar/xy
talaðu/x
tald/z
talt/v
talurnar/x
tant/y
tekningarlista/R
tikin/vxy
tiknar/vx
til/w
tilhoyra/R
tilvitað/z
tjóðveldismanna/R
tornað/v
tromina/R
trygg/z
tryggum/z
trúgvir/z
trúskapur/z
tunguna/R
tíðindastovuna/R
tónar/x
tøkan/vwx
tøkum/vw
tøkur/vw
um/vwy
umhugsað/z
umhvørvisskaða/R
umskorið/z
umskornum/z
undir/v
ungdómsvenjara/R
uttanríkisdeildina/R
vaksin/vx
vaksið/x
vaktur/v
valdu/y
vanligar/z
vantrúna/R
varliga/z
varpaður/y
veggi/y
vegir/xy
veitina/R
veking/v
venja/v
venjingar/v
verðinsmanna/R
vikað/z
vinning/y
vinum/z
virkin/z
virkisgarða/PQR
virðiligum/z
vissað/z
vita/PQRz
vitigum/z
viðgjørdur/z
vunnin/y
vágsmanna/R
vápnað/xz
væntað/z
vísindaliga/PQR
vísir/xz
vístar/xy
vístir/xy
vøkstur/v
vørpa/v
ynskt/z
yvir/y
yvirvágina/R
áminningina/R
ærligur/z
ættarhøvdinga/R
í/vwy
íblanding/v
íroknað/v
ískoyti/v
ólýdna/R
úr/vy
úrvalsmanna/R
